Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2111
Board of directors; election; vacancy.

The business and affairs of the corporation shall be conducted by a board of directors. The number of directors shall at all times be a multiple of three. Two-thirds of the directors shall be elected by the members and one-third shall be elected by the shareholders. Any vacancy in the office of a director elected by members shall be filled by the directors elected by the members, and any vacancy in the office of a director elected by the shareholders shall be filled by the directors elected by the shareholders.

Laws 1967, c. 100, § 11, p. 307.

Cumulative voting for directors, see Article XII, section 1, Constitution of Nebraska.